California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(b) A notice filed with the board to modify or redirect a distribution pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be accompanied by a report detailing all receipts and expenditures over the two prior fiscal years of the funds and accounts proposed to be affected by the notice.

(c) Initial approval of a distribution modification or redirection pursuant to this section shall be limited to a one-year period. An approval may be extended in subsequent years contingent upon annual receipt of the report described in subdivision (e) and a determination by the board that the extension is in the economic interest of thoroughbred racing. However, in order for an initial approval of a distribution modification or redirection to be extended beyond the first year, the consent of each organization and entity that gave its
 consent to that initial distribution modification or redirection shall also be obtained for the extension. In the absence of the consent of all of these organizations and entities, the board shall not approve the extension.

(d) A thoroughbred association or fair whose written notice for a percentage deduction pursuant to subdivision (a) has been approved by the board shall provide subsequent quarterly reports of receipts and expenditures of the affected funds if requested by the board.

(e) A thoroughbred association or fair whose written notice for a percentage deduction pursuant to subdivision (a) has been approved by the board shall file a report with the board and the respective fiscal committees and Committees on Governmental Organization of the Senate and the Assembly accounting for all receipts and expenditures in any of the affected funds. This
 report shall be filed within one year of initial board approval and annually thereafter if the approval is extended by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 636, Sec. 1.   (SB 517)   Effective October 23, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

19601.02.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 19610, every thoroughbred association or fair that conducts a live race meeting shall deduct an additional 2 percent of the total amount handled on exotic wagers requiring the selection of two wagering interests, and 3 percent of the total amount handled on exotic wagers requiring the selection of three or more wagering interests.

(b) The funds collected pursuant to subdivision (a) from wagers placed within the inclosure of a thoroughbred association or fair conducting a race meeting, at satellite locations within this state, and from account wagers originating within this state, shall be distributed to the purse account of the meet conducting racing in the zone in which
 the wager was placed, and distributed in accordance with subdivision (d).

(c) Any thoroughbred racing association or fair, when it authorizes betting systems located outside this state to accept wagers on a race, shall retain from the total amount received by the association or fair from the out-of-state betting system, the incremental amount received as a result of the takeout specified in subdivision (a) for distribution as overnight purses in accordance with subdivision (d) without regard to the provisions of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 19602. The method utilized to determine the incremental amount received as a result of the takeout increase specified in subdivision (a) shall be established by agreement between the various affected thoroughbred racing associations and fairs and the applicable horsemen’s organization. Should the thoroughbred racing association or fair and the applicable horsemen’s organization be unable to
 reach an agreement as to the method of making such determination, the board shall determine the appropriate allocation method after a hearing on the matter.

(d) The amounts collected pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) shall be utilized solely to augment and not supplant overnight purses. Within 90 days after the conclusion of a given meet, the thoroughbred association or fair receiving funds pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) shall report to the board the manner in which the funds were used to augment and not supplant overnight purses at that meet.

(e) The board shall have the authority to postpone or revoke the implementation of the takeout increase specified in subdivision (a) if the board determines that the incremental amount that results from the negotiations with the out-of-state betting systems is incrementally insufficient.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 283, Sec. 2.   (SB 1072)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19601.2.

During calendar periods when any other fair or thoroughbred association and the Humboldt County Fair simultaneously conduct race meetings in the northern zone, the other fair or thoroughbred association shall be the association authorized to distribute the signal and accept wagers on out-of-zone, out-of-state, and out-of-country races if it complies with the conditions specified in subdivision (a) of Section 19601. The amounts deducted from these wagers shall be distributed as provided in Section 19601. Additionally, from, and to the extent of, commissions and purses generated from the total handle of the other fair or thoroughbred association during the overlap, the other fair or thoroughbred association shall distribute to the Humboldt County Fair, not less than seven days after the close of the racing meeting, an amount equal to 0.75 percent of the out-of-zone, out-of-state, and out-of-country handle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 122, Sec. 2.   Effective August 6, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

19601.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a quarter horse racing association, subject to approval by the board, may deduct from the total amount handled in the parimutuel pool for any type of wager up to 2 percent more of the total amount handled than was authorized on May 1, 2009. Funds deducted pursuant to this additional authority shall be distributed as follows:

(1) All of the funds, up to 1 percent on the first fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per day handled, to eligible satellite wagering facilities that are in compliance with Article 9.2 (commencing with Section 19605), based on the wagers they accept, and provided further that they accept all available signals from the quarter horse
 racing association.

(2) The remainder of the funds shall be distributed with 50 percent going to the quarter horse horsemen’s organization for purses and the other 50 percent being retained by the racing association.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a harness racing association, subject to approval by the board, may deduct from the total amount handled in the parimutuel pool for any type of wager up to 2 percent more of the total amount handled than was authorized on May 1, 2009. Funds deducted pursuant to this additional authority shall be distributed as follows:

(1) All of the funds, up to 1 percent on the first fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per day handled, to eligible satellite wagering facilities that are in compliance with Article 9.2 (commencing with Section 19605), based on the wagers they
 accept, and provided further that they accept all available signals from the harness racing association.

(2) The remainder of the funds shall be distributed with 50 percent going to the harness horsemen’s organization for purses and the other 50 percent being retained by the racing association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 226, Sec. 3.   (AB 246)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

19601.4.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a fair, combination of fairs, or an association conducting racing at a fair may, after approval from the board, deduct an additional 1 percent from the total amount handled daily in its conventional and exotic pools. The additional 1 percent shall be deposited into the Inclosure Facilities Improvement Fund, which is hereby created as a special fund in the State Treasury, the moneys of which are available upon appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act. Any moneys deducted from the handle pursuant to this section shall be used solely for the purpose of facilities maintenance and improvements at a fair’s racetrack inclosure for those fairs that contribute to, or for those fairs where an association conducting racing at that fair contributes
 to, the Inclosure Facilities Improvement Fund.

(b) The secretary shall appoint a committee of not more than five and no fewer than three individuals with expertise in financing, constructing, and managing horse racing facilities, to advise in the administration of the funds. The secretary shall have oversight over the committee. The secretary shall adhere to the same oversight responsibilities as outlined in Section 3201 of the Food and Agricultural Code, when administering the funds contributed and disbursed pursuant to this section.

(c) The secretary shall include in the annual expenditure plan required pursuant to Section 3205 of the Food and Agricultural Code any allocations made pursuant to this section.

(d) For purposes of this section, “secretary” means the Secretary of Food and
 Agriculture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 559, Sec. 9.   (AB 2143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

19602.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any racing association located in this state may authorize betting systems located outside of this state to accept wagers on a race or races conducted or disseminated by that association and may transmit live audiovisual signals of the race or races and their results to those betting systems, except that any authorization is subject to the consent of the host association and applicable federal laws, including, but not limited to, Chapter 57 (commencing with Section 3001) of Title 15 of the United States Code.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), any racing association described in subdivision (a), when it authorizes betting systems located outside of this state to accept wagers on a race, shall pay a license fee to the state in an amount equal to 8 percent of the total amount received by the association from the out-of-state betting system. In addition, with respect to thoroughbred racing only, 3 percent of the amount remaining after the payment of the license fee shall be deposited with the official registering agency pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 19617.2, and shall thereafter be distributed in accordance with subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 19617.2. The remaining amount received by the association shall be distributed to the association that conducts the racing meeting and to horsemen participating in that racing meeting as follows: 50 percent to the association as commissions, and 50 percent to the horsemen as purses. All rents, costs, and fees shall be deducted pursuant to a contract between the association that conducts the racing meeting and the horsemen participating in the racing meeting. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, racing associations may form a partnership, joint venture, or any other affiliation in order to negotiate terms and conditions of agreements with out-of-state betting systems.

(2) A thoroughbred association that hosts the series of races known as the “Breeder’s Cup” shall not be required to pay to the state the license fees required pursuant to paragraph (1). Amounts received by the association from out-of-state betting systems as wagers on Breeder’s Cup races shall be distributed as follows: 50 percent as commissions to the association that conducts the racing meeting, and 50 percent as purses to the horsemen participating in the meeting.

(c) With the permission of the board, wagers accepted by betting systems located outside of this state may be, but are not required to be, included in the parimutuel pool of the association that conducts the racing meeting in this state. If the wagers accepted by betting systems located outside of this state are included in the parimutuel pool of the association that conducts the racing meeting in this state, the betting system located outside of this state shall, if permissible under applicable law, deduct from the total amount handled in each conventional and exotic parimutuel pool the same total percentages deducted pursuant to Article 9.5 (commencing with Section 19610) by the association that conducts the racing meeting in this state. If the laws of the jurisdiction in which the betting system is located do not permit the betting system to deduct the same percentages as are deducted by the association that conducts the racing meeting, the board may, nonetheless, permit the inclusion of those out-of-state wagers in the association’s parimutuel pool if the board determines it to be in the public interest of this state to do so.

(d) If wagers accepted by an association conducting a racing meeting within the state and wagers accepted by a betting system located outside of the state are combined in one parimutuel pool and the association and the betting system both deduct the same total percentages as set forth in subdivision (c), the breakage shall be allocated between the association and the betting system on the basis of a calculation for distribution approved by the board.

(e) If wagers accepted by an association conducting a racing meeting within the state are combined in one parimutuel pool with wagers accepted by a betting system located outside the state and the association and the betting system deduct different percentages from the amount handled in the parimutuel pool, the precise calculation and distribution of payments on winning tickets and breakage between the association and the betting system shall be on the basis of a calculation for distribution approved by the board.

(f) Breakage allocated pursuant to this section to an association conducting a racing meeting within this state shall be distributed in the same manner as would be breakage arising from wagers at the association in the absence of a combined parimutuel pool. This section does not apply to the disposition of breakage allocated to the betting system located outside of the state.

(g) If wagers accepted by a betting system located outside of this state are included in the parimutuel pool of an association conducting a racing meeting in this state, funds in the parimutuel pool attributable to unclaimed tickets relating to wagers accepted by the association conducting a racing meeting within the state shall be distributed in the same manner as unclaimed tickets relating to wagers accepted by that association in the absence of a combined parimutuel pool. Funds in the parimutuel pool attributable to unclaimed tickets related to wagers accepted by the betting system located outside of this state shall be allocated to that betting system, and this section does not otherwise apply to the disposition of those funds at that location outside of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 505, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

19603.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any racing association in this state may, with the approval of the board, accept out-of-state wagers on a race or races conducted by or disseminated by that association and may transmit live audiovisual signals of the race or races to locations out of state, except that any wagers made pursuant to this section are subject to applicable federal laws. The amounts deducted and distributed pursuant to this section shall be as provided in Section 19602 for all other out-of-state wagers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

19604.

The board may authorize a racing association, racing fair, betting system, or multijurisdictional wagering hub to conduct advance deposit wagering in accordance with this section. Racing associations, racing fairs, and their respective horsemen’s organizations may form a partnership, joint venture, or any other affiliation in order to further the purposes of this section.

(a) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Advance deposit wagering” (ADW) means a form of parimutuel wagering in which a person residing within California or outside of this state establishes an account with an ADW provider, and subsequently issues wagering
 instructions concerning the funds in this account, thereby authorizing the ADW provider holding the account to place wagers on the account owner’s behalf.

(2) “ADW provider” means a licensee, betting system, or multijurisdictional wagering hub, located within California or outside this state, that is authorized to conduct advance deposit wagering pursuant to this section.

(3) “Betting system” means a business conducted exclusively in this state that facilitates parimutuel wagering on races it simulcasts and other races it offers in its wagering menu.

(4) “Breed of racing” means as follows:

(A) With respect to associations and fairs licensed by the board to
 conduct thoroughbred, fair, or mixed breed race meetings, “breed of racing” shall mean thoroughbred.

(B) With respect to associations licensed by the board to conduct quarter horse race meetings, “breed of racing” shall mean quarter horse.

(C) With respect to associations and fairs licensed by the board to conduct standardbred race meetings, “breed of racing” shall mean standardbred.

(5) “Contractual compensation” means the amount paid to an ADW provider from advance deposit wagers originating in this state. Contractual compensation includes, but is not limited to, hub fee payments, and may include host fee payments, if any, for out-of-state and out-of-country races. Contractual compensation is subject to the
 following requirements:

(A) Excluding contractual compensation for host fee payments, contractual compensation shall not exceed 6.5 percent of the amount wagered.

(B) The host fee payments included within contractual compensation shall not exceed 3.5 percent of the amount wagered. Notwithstanding this provision, the host fee payment with respect to wagers on the Kentucky Derby, Preakness Stakes, Belmont Stakes, and selected Breeders’ Cup Championship races may be negotiated by the ADW provider, the racing associations accepting wagers on those races pursuant to Section 19596.2, and the horsemen’s organization.

(C) In order to ensure fair and consistent market access fee distributions to associations, fairs,
 horsemen, and breeders, for each breed of racing, the percentage of wagers paid as contractual compensation to an ADW provider pursuant to the terms of a hub agreement with a racing association or fair when that racing association or fair is conducting live racing shall be the same as the percentage of wagers paid as contractual compensation to that ADW provider when that racing association or fair is not conducting live racing.

(6) “Horsemen’s organization” means, with respect to a particular racing meeting, the organization recognized by the board as responsible for negotiating purse agreements on behalf of horsemen participating in that racing meeting.

(7) “Hub agreement” means a written agreement providing for contractual compensation paid with respect to advance deposit wagers
 placed by California residents on a particular breed of racing conducted outside of California. In the event a hub agreement exceeds a term of two years, then an ADW provider, one or more racing associations or fairs that together conduct no fewer than five weeks of live racing for the breed covered by the hub agreement, and the horsemen’s organization responsible for negotiating purse agreements for the breed covered by the hub agreement shall be signatories to the hub agreement. A hub agreement is required for an ADW provider to receive contractual compensation for races conducted outside of California.

(8) “Hub agreement arbitration” means an arbitration proceeding pursuant to which the disputed provisions of the hub agreement pertaining to the hub or host fees from wagers on races conducted outside of California provided pursuant to
 paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) are determined in accordance with the provisions of this paragraph. If a hub agreement arbitration is requested, all of the following shall apply:

(A) The ADW provider shall be permitted to accept advance deposit wagers from California residents.

(B) The contractual compensation received by the ADW provider shall be the average of the contractual compensation specified in the hub agreement that is the subject of the hub agreement arbitration and the contractual compensation set forth in the hub agreement arbitration notice.

(C) The difference between the contractual compensation specified in subparagraph (B) and the contractual compensation determined to be payable at the conclusion
 of the hub agreement arbitration shall be calculated and paid within 15 days following the arbitrator’s decision and order. The hub agreement arbitration shall be held as promptly as possible, but in no event more than 60 days following the demand for that arbitration. The arbitrator shall issue a decision no later than 15 days following the conclusion of the arbitration. A single arbitrator jointly selected by the ADW provider and the party requesting a hub agreement arbitration shall conduct the hub agreement arbitration. However, if the parties cannot agree on the arbitrator within seven days of issuance of the written demand for arbitration, then the arbitrator shall be selected pursuant to the Streamlined Arbitration Rules and Procedures of the Judicial Arbitration and Mediation Services, or pursuant to the applicable rules of its successor organization. In making the hub agreement arbitration
 determination, the arbitrator shall be required to choose between the contractual compensation of the hub agreement agreed to by the ADW provider or whatever different terms for the hub agreement were proposed by the party requesting the hub agreement arbitration. The arbitrator shall select the set of terms that most accurately reflects the then-existing market rate of compensation for the services provided by the ADW provider based on all relevant facts and circumstances relating to California resident ADW wagering. The arbitrator shall not be permitted to impose new, different, or compromised terms to the hub agreement. If an arbitration is requested, either party may bring an action in state court to compel a party to go into arbitration, to review the arbitrator’s decision, or to enforce the decision of the arbitrator. The cost of the hub agreement arbitration, including the cost of the
 arbitrator, shall be borne in equal shares by the parties to the hub agreement and the party or parties requesting a hub
 agreement arbitration. The hub agreement arbitration shall be administered by the Judicial Arbitration and Mediation Services pursuant to its Streamlined Arbitration Rules and Procedures or its successor organization.

(9) “Incentive awards” means those payments provided for in Sections 19617.2, 19617.7, 19617.8, 19617.9, and 19619. The amount determined to be payable for incentive awards under this section shall be payable to the applicable official registering agency and thereafter distributed as provided in this chapter.

(10) “Licensee” means a racing association or fair licensed to conduct a live racing meet in this state, or affiliation thereof, authorized under this section.

(11) “Market access fee”
 means the amount of advance deposit wagering handle remaining after the payment of winning wagers, and after the payment of contractual compensation, if any, to an ADW provider. Market access fees shall be distributed in accordance with subdivision (f).

(12) “Multijurisdictional wagering hub” means a business conducted in more than one jurisdiction that facilitates parimutuel wagering on races it simulcasts and other races it offers in its wagering menu.

(13) “Racing fair” means a fair authorized by the board to conduct live racing.

(14) “Zone” means the zone of the state, as defined in Section 19530.5, except as modified by subdivision (f) of Section 19601. For these purposes, the central and southern zones shall
 together be considered one zone.

(b) Wagers shall be accepted according to the procedures set forth in this subdivision.

(1) An ADW provider shall not accept wagers or wagering instructions on races conducted in California from a resident of California unless all of the following conditions are met:

(A) The ADW provider is licensed by the board.

(B) A written agreement allowing those wagers exists with the racing association or fair conducting the races on which the wagers are made.

(C) The agreement referenced in subparagraph (B) shall have been approved in writing by the horsemen’s
 organization responsible for negotiating purse agreements for the breed on which the wagers are made in accordance with the federal Interstate Horseracing Act of 1978 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 3001 et seq.), regardless of the location of the ADW provider, whether in California or otherwise, including, without limitation, any and all requirements contained therein with respect to written consents and required written agreements of horsemen’s groups to the terms and conditions of the acceptance of those wagers and any arrangements as to the exclusivity between the host racing association or fair and the ADW provider. For purposes of this subdivision, the substantive provisions of the federal Interstate Horseracing Act of 1978 shall be taken into account without regard to whether, by its own terms, that act is applicable to advance deposit wagering on races conducted in California accepted from residents of
 California.

(2) An ADW provider shall not accept wagers or wagering instructions on races conducted outside of California from a resident of California unless all of the following conditions are met:

(A) The ADW provider is licensed by the board.

(B) There is a hub agreement between the ADW provider and one or both of (i) one or more racing associations or fairs that together conduct no fewer than five weeks of live racing on the breed on which wagering is conducted during the calendar year during which the wager is placed, and (ii) the horsemen’s organization responsible for negotiating purse agreements for the breed on which wagering is conducted.

(C) If the parties referenced in clauses (i) and (ii) of subparagraph (B) are both signatories to the hub agreement, then no party shall have the right to request a hub agreement arbitration.

(D) If only the party or parties referenced in clause (i) of subparagraph (B) is a signatory to the hub agreement, then the signatories to the hub agreement shall, within five days of execution of the hub agreement, provide a copy of the hub agreement to the horsemen’s organization responsible for negotiating purse agreements for the breed on which wagering is conducted for each race conducted outside of California on which California residents may place advance deposit wagers. Before receipt of the hub agreement, the horsemen’s organization shall sign a nondisclosure agreement with the ADW provider agreeing to hold confidential all terms of
 the hub agreement. If the horsemen’s organization wants to request a hub agreement arbitration, it shall send written notice of its election to the signatories to the hub agreement within 10 days after receipt of the copy of the hub agreement, and shall provide its alternate proposal to the hub and host fees specified in the hub agreement with that written notice. If the horsemen’s organization does not provide that written notice within the 10-day period, then no party shall have the right to request a hub agreement arbitration. If the horsemen’s organization does provide that written notice within the 10-day period, then the ADW provider shall have 10 days to elect in writing to do one of the following:

(i) Abandon the hub agreement.

(ii) Accept the alternate proposal submitted
 by the horsemen’s organization.

(iii) Proceed with a hub agreement arbitration.

(E) If only the party referenced in clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) is a signatory to the hub agreement, then the signatories to the hub agreement shall, within five days of execution of the hub agreement, provide written notice of the host and hub fees applicable pursuant to the hub agreement for each race conducted outside of California on which California residents may place advance deposit wagers, which notice shall be provided to all racing associations and fairs conducting live racing of the same breed covered by the hub agreement. If any racing association or fair wants to request a hub agreement arbitration, it shall send written notice of its election to the signatories to the hub agreement within
 10 days after receipt of the notice of host and hub fees. It shall also provide its alternate proposal to the hub and host fees specified in the hub agreement with the notice of its election. If more than one racing association or fair provides notice of their request for hub agreement arbitration, those racing associations or fairs, or both, shall have a period of five days to jointly agree upon which of their alternate proposals shall be the official proposal for purposes of the hub agreement arbitration. If one or more racing associations or fairs that together conduct no fewer than five weeks of live racing on the breed on which wagering is conducted during the calendar year during which the wager is placed does not provide written notice of their election to arbitrate within the 10-day period, then no party shall have the right to request a hub agreement arbitration. If a valid hub agreement
 arbitration request is made, then the ADW provider shall have 10 days to elect in writing to do one of the following:

(i) Abandon the hub agreement.

(ii) Accept the alternate proposal submitted by the racing associations or fairs.

(iii) Proceed with a hub agreement arbitration.

The results of a hub agreement arbitration elected pursuant to this subdivision shall be binding on all other associations and fairs conducting live racing of that breed.

(F) The acceptance thereof is in compliance with the provisions of the federal Interstate Horseracing Act of 1978 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 3001 et seq.), regardless of the location of
 the ADW provider, whether in California or otherwise, including, without limitation, any and all requirements contained therein with respect to written consents and required written agreements of horsemen’s groups to the terms and conditions of the acceptance of the wagers and any arrangements as to the exclusivity between the host racing association or fair and the ADW provider.

(c) An advance deposit wager may be made only by the ADW provider holding the account pursuant to wagering instructions issued by the owner of the funds communicated by telephone call or through other electronic media. The ADW provider shall ensure the identification of the account’s owner by using methods and technologies approved by the board. An ADW provider that accepts wagering instructions concerning races conducted in California, or accepts wagering
 instructions originating in California, shall provide a full accounting and verification of the source of the wagers thereby made, including the postal ZIP Code and breed of the source of the wagers, in the form of a daily download of parimutuel data to a database designated by the board. The daily download shall be delivered in a timely basis using file formats specified by the database designated by the board, and shall include any and all data necessary to calculate and distribute moneys according to the rules and regulations governing California parimutuel wagering. All reasonable costs associated with the creation, provision, and transfer of this data shall be borne by the ADW provider.

(d) (1) (A) The board shall develop and adopt rules to license and regulate all phases of operation of
 advance deposit wagering for ADW providers operating in California, including advance deposit wagering activity that takes place within a minisatellite wagering facility. The board may recover costs associated with the licensing or regulation of advance deposit wagering activities in a minisatellite wagering facility either directly from the ADW provider or through an appropriate increase in the funding formula devised by the board pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 19616.51.

(B) The board shall not approve an application for an original or renewal license as an ADW provider unless the entity, if requested in writing by a bona fide labor organization no later than 90 days before licensing, has entered into a contractual agreement with that labor organization that provides all of the following:

(i) The labor organization has historically represented employees who accept or process any form of wagering at the nearest horse racing meeting located in California.

(ii) The agreement establishes the method by which the ADW provider will agree to recognize and bargain in good faith with a labor organization that has demonstrated majority status by submitting authorization cards signed by those employees who accept or process any form of wagering for which a California ADW license is required.

(iii) The agreement requires the ADW provider to maintain its neutrality concerning the choice of those employees who accept or process any form of wagering for which a California ADW license is required whether or not to
 authorize the labor organization to represent them with regard to wages, hours, and other terms and conditions of employment.

(iv) The agreement applies to those classifications of employees who accept or process wagers for which a California ADW license is required whether the facility is located within or outside of California.

(C) (i) The agreement required by subparagraph (B) shall not be conditioned by either party upon the other party agreeing to matters outside the requirements of subparagraph (B).

(ii) The requirement in subparagraph (B) shall not apply to an ADW provider that has entered into a collective bargaining agreement with a bona fide labor organization that is the exclusive bargaining
 representative of employees who accept or process parimutuel wagers on races for which an ADW license is required whether the facility is located within or outside of California.

(D) Permanent state or county employees and nonprofit organizations that have historically performed certain services at county, state, or district fairs may continue to provide those services.

(E) Parimutuel clerks employed by racing associations or fairs or employees of ADW providers who accept or process any form of wagers who are laid off due to lack of work shall have preferential hiring rights for new positions with their employer in occupations whose duties include accepting or processing any form of wagers, or the operation, repair, service, or maintenance of equipment that accepts or processes
 any form of wagering at a racetrack, satellite wagering facility, or ADW provider licensed by the board. The preferential hiring rights established by this subdivision shall be conditioned upon the employee meeting the minimum qualification requirements of the new job.

(2) The board shall develop and adopt rules and regulations requiring ADW providers to establish security access policies and safeguards, including, but not limited to, the following:

(A) The ADW provider shall use board-approved methods to perform location and age verification confirmation with respect to persons establishing an advance deposit wagering account.

(B) The ADW provider shall use personal identification numbers (PINs) or other technologies to
 ensure that only the accountholder has access to the advance deposit wagering account.

(C) The ADW provider shall provide for withdrawals from the wagering account only by means of a check made payable to the accountholder and sent to the address of the accountholder or by means of an electronic transfer to an account held by the verified accountholder or the accountholder may withdraw funds from the wagering account at a facility approved by the board by presenting verifiable account identification information.

(D) The ADW provider shall allow the board access to its premises to visit, investigate, audit, and place expert accountants and other persons it deems necessary for the purpose of ensuring that its rules and regulations concerning credit authorization, account access,
 and other security provisions are strictly complied with. To ensure that the amounts retained from the parimutuel handle are distributed under law, rules, or agreements, any ADW provider that accepts wagering instructions concerning races conducted in California or accepts wagering instructions originating in California shall provide an independent “agreed-upon procedures” audit for each California racing meeting, within 60 days of the conclusion of the race meeting. The auditing firm to be used and the content and scope of the audit, including host fee obligations, shall be set forth in the applicable agreement. The ADW provider shall provide the board, horsemen’s organizations, and the host racing association with an annual parimutuel audit of the financial transactions of the ADW provider with respect to wagers authorized pursuant to this section, prepared in accordance with generally accepted
 auditing standards and the requirements of the board. Any and all reasonable costs associated with those audits shall be borne by the ADW provider.

(3) The board shall prohibit advance deposit wagering advertising that it determines to be deceptive to the public. The board shall also require, by regulation, that every form of advertising contain a statement that minors are not allowed to open or have access to advance deposit wagering accounts.

(e) In order for a licensee, betting system, or multijurisdictional wagering hub to be approved by the board as an ADW provider, it shall meet both of the following requirements:

(1) All wagers thereby made shall be included in the appropriate parimutuel pool under a contractual
 agreement with the applicable host track.

(2) The amounts deducted from advance deposit wagers shall be in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

(f) After the payment of contractual compensation, the amounts received as market access fees from advance deposit wagers, which shall not be considered for purposes of Section 19616.51, shall be distributed as follows:

(1) An amount equal to 0.0011 multiplied by the amount handled on advance deposit wagers originating in California for each racing meeting shall be distributed to the Center for Equine Health to establish the Kenneth L. Maddy Fund for the benefit of the School of Veterinary Medicine at the University of California at Davis.

(2) An amount equal to 0.0003 multiplied by the amount handled on advance deposit wagers originating in California for each racing meeting shall be distributed to the Public Employment Relations Board to cover costs associated with audits conducted pursuant to Section 19526 and for purposes of reimbursing the State Mediation and Conciliation Service for costs incurred pursuant to this section. However, if that amount would exceed the costs of the Public Employment Relations Board, the amount distributed to that board shall be reduced, and that reduction shall be forwarded to an organization designated by the racing association or fair described in subdivision (a) for the purpose of augmenting a compulsive gambling prevention program specifically addressing that problem.

(3) An